Washington statutes.
RCW 37.08.280

Veterans hospitals.

Upon the filing of an appropriate notice thereof with the governor by the administrator of veterans affairs, an agency of the United States of America, pursuant to the provisions of section 302 of Public Law 93-82 (87 Stat. 195; 38 U.S.C. Sec. 5007), the governor is hereby authorized and directed to accept such legislative jurisdiction as is necessary to establish concurrent jurisdiction between the United States and the state of Washington to all land comprising the veterans hospital located at Vancouver in Clark county, Washington; the veterans administration hospital located at Walla Walla in Walla Walla county, Washington, and the veterans administration hospital located at American Lake in Pierce county, Washington. The acquisition of such concurrent jurisdiction shall become effective upon filing the documents signifying such acceptance in the office of the secretary of state.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 142 s 1.]